Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
Article 5 Natural Gas Competition and Deregulation
46-4-158.1.
Rules and regulations; reporting on service quality; noncompliance with service quality standards; third party forecasting; independent auditors; gas held in storage for marketer.

Not later than September 1, 2002, the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to establish service quality standards for each electing distribution company, including, but not limited to, minimum performance standards for posting data on the electronic bulletin board; meter reading; meter turn-ons and turn-offs; forecasting; call center response times; lost and unaccounted for natural gas; acquiring and managing interstate capacity assets, including retained storage; and any other service quality standards deemed necessary by the commission.

Not later than September 1, 2002, the commission shall promulgate rules and regulations to establish service quality standards for each certificated marketer and regulated provider, which may include minimum performance standards for call center response times, billing, meter reading, and any other service quality standards deemed necessary by the commission. Each service quality standard adopted by the commission applicable to an electing distribution company shall also apply to each certificated marketer and each regulated provider to the extent that a certificated marketer or a regulated provider provides the same customer services.

Each electing distribution company, certificated marketer, and regulated provider shall file reports with the commission showing its performance with regard to service quality standards established in accordance with this Code section. Such reports shall be filed at least quarterly, or on a more frequent basis if ordered by the commission.

Failure to comply with service quality standards established in accordance with this Code section shall subject an electing distribution company, certificated marketer, or regulated provider to fines as determined by the commission.

At least annually the commission shall conduct a proceeding to review compliance with the service quality standards by the electing distribution company, certificated marketer, and regulated provider.

If the commission determines that an electing distribution company has failed to satisfactorily meet the performance standards for system forecasting, including setting the daily supply requirement and the marketer firm obligation, or has otherwise demonstrated an inability to perform such function properly, then the commission may enter an order relieving the electing distribution company of its system forecasting responsibilities and may establish a competitive request for proposal process to select an independent entity with the technical and financial ability to perform the role of system forecasting, including setting the daily supply requirement and the marketer firm obligation. The agreement for system forecasting shall include standards for evaluating the performance of the forecaster and for awarding incentives for superior performance and imposing disincentives for unsatisfactory performance. The commission shall establish an appropriate mechanism to recover the cost of performing such functions.

If the commission determines that the public interest would be served thereby, the commission may enter an order establishing a competitive request for proposal process to select an independent auditor or auditors for the purpose of examining:

The daily, monthly, and annual accounting of transactions among each electing distribution company, its affiliated companies, and certificated marketers; and

Compliance with the provisions of subsections (b) and (c) of Code Section 46-4-159.

Any independent auditor selected in accordance with subsection (f) of this Code section shall prepare a semiannual audit report to the commission. Unless a written objection clearly specifying one or more errors or inaccuracies in the audit report is filed within ten days after the audit report is filed with the commission, the audit report shall be accepted by the commission. If an objection is filed, the commission shall conduct an expedited hearing within ten days after the objection is filed to determine whether to accept the audit report. A final decision shall be issued five days after such a hearing. An audit report, along with its status as accepted or not accepted by the commission, shall be admissible in any litigation relating to transactions described or evaluated in the audit report.

Sale of gas held in storage for a certificated marketer to third parties by an electing distribution company shall be prohibited; provided, however, that use of gas held in storage for a certificated marketer by the electing distribution company to ensure system balancing and reliability shall not be prohibited.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-158.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 15.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2002.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

46-4-158.2.
Rules governing marketer’s terms of service.

The commission shall by September 1, 2002, adopt rules governing a marketer’s terms of service for natural gas consumers. Such rules shall provide, without limitation, that:

Each retail natural gas marketer shall establish policies and procedures for handling billing disputes and requests for payment arrangements, which must be approved by the commission;

A marketer’s advertised prices shall reflect the prices or the pricing methodology in disclosure statements and billed prices and shall be presented in the standard pricing unit of the electing distribution company;

The consumer shall have a right to contact the commission if he or she is not satisfied with the response of the marketer;

Marketers shall provide all consumers with a three-day right of rescission following the receipt of the disclosure statement, which shall be provided to consumers at times specified in rules and regulations of the commission. Consumers may cancel an agreement in writing or electronically by contacting the marketer;

Whenever a marketer offers a fixed term agreement and the expiration date of such agreement is approaching, or whenever a marketer proposes to change its terms of service under any type of agreement, the marketer shall provide written notification to the natural gas consumer, clearly explaining the consumer’s options at that point, including, but not limited to, the option to seek another marketer;

A marketer shall not charge cancellation fees to a low-income residential consumer seeking service for the first time from the regulated provider;

Gas service to a consumer shall be disconnected only for failure to pay for service from the consumer’s current marketer. A marketer may not request disconnection of service for nonpayment of a bill which was not sent to the consumer in a timely manner. Every marketer shall be required to offer at least one reasonable payment arrangement in writing to a consumer prior to requesting that such consumer be disconnected for failure to pay. Disconnection of service to a consumer is authorized no earlier than 15 days after a notice that service will be disconnected;

Marketers shall be prohibited from sending estimated bills to natural gas consumers; provided, however, that when information from actual meter readings is not made available by the electing distribution company or any other party authorized to perform meter reading, marketers may send an estimated bill for not more than two consecutive months; and

No marketer shall be authorized to prevent a consumer from obtaining distribution and commodity sales service from another marketer or provider.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-158.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 15; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 38/SB 148.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2002.

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in paragraph (3), deleted “and the consumers’ utility counsel division of the Governor’s Office of Consumer Affairs” following “contact the commission”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Natural Gas Marketers’ Terms of Service, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia Public Service Commission, Gas Utilities, Chapter 515-7-9.

46-4-158.3.
Adequate and accurate consumer information disclosure statements; bills.

The commission shall, by September 1, 2002, adopt rules and regulations requiring marketers which provide firm distribution service under this article to provide adequate and accurate consumer information to enable consumers to make informed choices regarding the purchase of natural gas services. Such rules shall provide, without limitation, that:

A disclosure statement shall be provided to consumers in an understandable format that enables such consumers to compare prices and services on a uniform basis. Rules adopted by the commission shall provide when disclosure statements shall be provided to consumers. Such disclosure statements shall include, but shall not be limited to, the following:

For fixed rate charges for natural gas service, a clear disclosure of the components of the fixed rate, the actual prices charged by the marketer, presented in a single standard pricing unit which includes any charges imposed by the marketer or its agent, so that the consumer can compare rates among marketers. This disclosure shall not include state and local sales taxes. The standard pricing disclosure unit must include all recurring monthly charges;

For variable rate charges for natural gas service, a clear and understandable explanation of the factors that will cause the price to vary and how often the price can change, the current price, and the ceiling price, if any, so that the consumer can compare rates among marketers. The current price and ceiling price, if applicable, shall be presented in a single standard pricing unit which includes any charges imposed by the marketer or its agent. This disclosure shall not include state and local sales taxes. The standard pricing disclosure unit must include all recurring monthly charges;

A statement that the standard unit price does not include state and local taxes or charges imposed by the electing distribution company;

The length of the agreement, including the starting date and expiration date, if applicable;

The billing interval, the method by which monthly charges imposed by the electing distribution company will be billed to the consumer in the event the consumer commences or terminates service with the marketer during the billing interval, and any late payment, cancellation, or reconnection fees;

The marketer’s budget billing, payment, credit, deposit, cancellation, collection, and reconnection policies and procedures;

How to contact the marketer for information or complaints;

A statement of the natural gas consumer’s right to contact the commission if he or she is not satisfied with the response of the marketer, including the local and toll-free telephone numbers of these agencies;

The division name and telephone number for information regarding heating assistance administered by the Department of Human Services;

The following statement:

“A consumer shall have a three-day right of rescission following the receipt of this disclosure at the time of initiating service or when informed of a change in terms or conditions. You, the consumer, may cancel in writing or electronically by contacting the marketer.”;

The following statement:

“If you have a fixed term agreement with us and it is approaching the expiration date, or whenever we propose to change our terms of service in any type of agreement, you will receive written notification from us prior to the date of expiration of or change to the agreement. We will explain your options to you in this advance notification.”;

A statement setting forth the requirements of paragraphs (6) through (9) of Code Section 46-4-158.2; and

A statement that deposits shall not exceed $150.00; and

Natural gas consumers’ bills shall be accurate and understandable and shall contain sufficient information for a consumer to compute and compare the total cost of competitive retail natural gas services. Such bills shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

The consumer’s name, billing address, service address, and natural gas company account number;

The dates of service covered by the bill, an itemization of each type of competitive natural gas service covered by the bill, any related billing components, the charge for each type of natural gas service, and any other information the consumer would need to recalculate the bill for accuracy;

The applicable billing determinants, including beginning meter reading, ending meter reading, multipliers, and any other consumption adjustments;

The amount billed for the current period, any unpaid amounts due from previous periods, any payments or credits applied to the consumer’s account during the current period, any late payment charges or gross and net charges, if applicable, and the total amount due and payable;

The due date for payment to keep the account current;

The current balance of the account, if the natural gas consumer is billed according to a budget plan;

Options and instructions on how the natural gas consumer can make a payment;

A toll-free or local telephone number and address for consumer billing questions or complaints for any retail natural gas company whose charges appear on the bill;

The applicable electing distribution company’s 24 hour local or toll-free telephone number for reporting service emergencies; and

An explanation of any codes and abbreviations used.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-158.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 15; Ga. L. 2009, p. 453, § 2-2/HB 228; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 39/SB 148.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2002.

The 2009 amendment,

effective July 1, 2009, substituted “Department of Human Services” for “Department of Human Resources” in subparagraph (1)(I).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, in subparagraph (1)(H), deleted “and the consumers’ utility counsel division of the Governor’s Office of Consumer Affairs” following “contact the commission”.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

46-4-158.4.
Authority to establish minimum standards for nonresidential customers.

The commission shall by September 1, 2002, adopt rules establishing minimum standards for a marketer’s terms and conditions of service for various classes of firm retail customers that are nonresidential and small businesses. In defining such classes, the commission may consider relevant factors, including but not limited to consumption history, estimated usage, and the size of the customer.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-158.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 15.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2002.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

46-4-158.5.
Continuing review by commission.

The commission shall continually review marketers’ compliance with rules promulgated in accordance with Code Sections 46-4-158.2, 46-4-158.3, and 46-4-158.4.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-158.5

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 15.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2002.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Natural Gas Marketers’ Terms of Service, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia Public Service Commission, Gas Utilities, Chapter 515-7-9.

46-4-159.
Standards of conduct for electing distribution companies; response to complaints.

As used in this Code section and notwithstanding any other provision of this article, the term:

“Control” includes without limitation the possession, directly or indirectly and whether acting alone or in conjunction with others, of the authority to direct or cause the direction of the management or policies of a person. A voting interest of 10 percent or more creates a rebuttable presumption of control. The term control includes the terms controlling, controlled by, and under control with.

“Electing distribution company” includes any agent of or consultant to the electing distribution company.

“Marketer” means any person who engages in selling gas:

To retail customers connected to the facilities of an electing distribution company; or

To other marketers for resale to such customers; provided, however, that the term marketer shall not mean a person who only makes sales beyond the electing distribution company’s system to other marketers for resale when the transportation capacity for the distribution of the gas to the electing distribution company’s system is obtained from a person or entity which is not an affiliate of the electing distribution company.

An electing distribution company must conduct its business to conform to the following standards, which are intended to prevent any advantage or disadvantage accruing to a marketer, including a marketer which is an affiliate of the electing distribution company, in relation to other marketers and their customers and which standards shall be applied to accomplish this intent:

An electing distribution company must apply the terms and conditions of its tariff and other tariff provisions related to the distribution of gas in the same manner to all marketers and to all customers without respect to their supplier;

An electing distribution company must process all similar requests for service in the same manner to all marketers in a reasonably similar time period;

An electing distribution company may not, through tariff or otherwise, give any marketer or its customers preference over any other marketer or similarly situated customers in matters relating to the movement or delivery of gas on its distribution facilities or the administration of contracts, including scheduling, nomination, balancing, metering, storage, standby service, curtailment policy, and billing and invoice questions and disputes;

An electing distribution company shall apply the same tariff provisions relating to discounts, rebates, fee waivers, or penalty waivers to all similarly situated customers without respect to their marketer. Any discretionary right under a tariff provision shall be applied by the electing distribution company impartially to all similarly situated customers without respect to their marketer. Where not subject to tariff provisions, an electing distribution company must contemporaneously offer the same discounts, rebates, fee waivers, or penalty waivers to all similarly situated customers without respect to their marketer and effectuate such contemporaneous offers by making an appropriate posting on the general alert screen of its electronic bulletin board;

An electing distribution company must not give preference to any marketer in the scheduling or allocation of capacity at a city gate station;

An electing distribution company must not directly or indirectly give any marketer any form of preference over any other marketer in matters relating to allocation, assignment, release, or other transfer of the electing distribution company’s capacity rights on interstate pipeline systems or in the sale of gas;

Neither the electing distribution company nor any marketer which is an affiliate of the company nor any other marketer may represent that any advantage accrues to customers or others in the use of electing distribution company services as a result of that customer or others dealing with the marketer. Also, joint promotions between the electing distribution company and any marketer, such as inclusion of fliers for the marketer in utility bills, are prohibited unless such promotions are offered to all other marketers under the same terms and conditions;

The electing distribution company must not preferentially provide sales leads to any marketer and must refrain from giving any appearance that the electing distribution company speaks on behalf of a marketer that is an affiliate of the company. If a customer requests information about marketers, to the extent the electing distribution company responds to the request, the electing distribution company should provide a list of all marketers on its system but shall not express any preferential recommendation for a marketer that is an affiliate of the company or for any other marketer;

Joint solicitation calls on end users by personnel of the electing distribution company and any marketer are forbidden; however, joint meetings will be scheduled at a mutually agreeable time and location if specifically requested in writing by the customer;

An electing distribution company must contemporaneously disclose information provided to any marketer related to the marketing or sale of natural gas to customers or identified potential customers or related to the delivery of natural gas to or on its system to all marketers on the system. The electing distribution company’s disclosure of such information must be effectuated by posting the information on the general alert screen of its electronic bulletin board. However, an electing distribution company may, when requested in writing to do so by a customer of a marketer, disclose confidential information relating to the customer only to said marketer. Notwithstanding any other provisions of this paragraph, an electing distribution company may respond to general inquiries from marketers, customers, identified potential customers, or other third parties regarding general information including the company’s terms and conditions, tariff provisions, location and description of facilities, or other similar information as required in the normal course of business by responding only to the requesting party;

An electing distribution company may not knowingly disclose to any marketer any confidential information obtained in connection with providing distribution or related services to any other marketer or customer, a potential marketer or customer, any agent of such customer or potential marketer, or a marketer;

Employees of the electing distribution company having direct responsibility for the day-to-day operations of the electing distribution company’s operations, including without limitation employees involved in:

Receiving distribution service requests or sales requests from retail customers;

Scheduling gas deliveries on the electing distribution company’s system;

Making gas scheduling or allocation decisions;

Purchasing gas or capacity; or

Selling gas to retail customers

shall not be shared with, shall be physically separated from, and must function independently of a marketer which is an affiliate of the company;

An electing distribution company must file with the commission procedures that will enable marketers and the commission to determine how the electing distribution company is complying with the standards set forth in this Code section; and

An electing distribution company must maintain its books of account and records separately from those of a marketer which is an affiliate of the company.

An electing distribution company must respond in writing within ten days to any informal complaint which is submitted in writing to the company and which relates to compliance with the standards set forth in this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-159

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4.

46-4-160.
Commission’s authority over certificated marketers; access to records; investigations and hearings; price summary; billing; violations; slamming.

With respect to a marketer certificated pursuant to Code Section 46-4-153, the commission shall have authority to:

Adopt reasonable rules and regulations governing the certification of a marketer;

Grant, modify, impose conditions upon, or revoke a certificate;

Adopt reasonable rules governing service quality. In promulgating consumer protection rules under this article, the commission shall, to the extent practicable, provide for rules with a self-executing mechanism to resolve such complaints in a timely manner. Such consumer protection rules shall encourage marketers to resolve complaints without recourse to the commission and shall expedite the handling of those complaints that do require action by the commission by providing for a minimum payment of $100.00 to the consumer, plus penalties and fines as determined by the commission, for violations of such rules;

Resolve complaints against a marketer regarding that marketer’s service;

Adopt reasonable rules and regulations relating to billing practices of marketers and information required on customers’ bills. The commission shall require at a minimum that bills specify the gas consumption amount, price per therm, distribution charges, and any service charges. The commission shall prescribe performance standards for marketer billing relating to accuracy and timeliness of customer bills;

Adopt reasonable rules and regulations relating to minimum resources which marketers are required to have in this state for customer service purposes. The rules and regulations shall require a marketer to have and maintain the ability to process cash payments from customers in this state. The rules and regulations shall provide procedures relating to the handling and disposition of customer complaints; and

Adopt reasonable rules and regulations requiring marketers to provide notification to retail customers of or include with customer bills information relating to where customers may obtain pricing information relative to gas marketers.

Prior to the determination by the commission pursuant to Code Section 46-4-156 that adequate market conditions exist within a delivery group, each marketer must separately state on its bills to retail customers within the delivery group the charges for firm distribution service and for commodity sales.

Except as otherwise provided by this article, the price at which a marketer sells gas shall not be regulated by the commission.

The commission shall have access to the books and records of marketers as may be necessary to ensure compliance with the provisions of this article and with the commission’s rules and regulations promulgated under this article.

Except as otherwise provided in this article, certification of a person as a marketer by the commission pursuant to Code Section 46-4-153 does not subject the person to the jurisdiction of the commission under this title, including without limitation the provisions of Article 2 of Chapter 2 of this title.

The provisions of Article 3 of Chapter 2 of this title shall apply to an investigation or hearing regarding a marketer. The provisions of Articles 4 and 5 of Chapter 2 of this title shall apply to a marketer.

The commission, subject to receiving state funds for such purpose, is required to have published at least quarterly in newspapers throughout the state a summary of the price per therm and any other amounts charged to retail customers by each marketer operating in this state and any additional information which the commission deems appropriate to assist customers in making decisions regarding choice of a marketer. In addition, the commission shall make such information available to Georgia Public Telecommunications (GPTV) under the jurisdiction of the Georgia Public Telecommunications Commission which will provide such information to the general public at a designated time at least once a month.

A marketer shall render a bill to retail customers for services within 30 days of the date following the monthly meter reading. A marketer’s bill shall utilize the results of the actual meter reading subject to paragraph (8) of Code Section 46-4-158.2. The price for natural gas billed to a natural gas consumer shall not exceed the marketer’s published price effective at the beginning of the consumer’s billing cycle. A marketer shall allow the natural gas consumer a reasonable period of time to pay the bill from the date the consumer receives the bill, prior to the application of any late fees or penalties. Marketers shall not impose unreasonable late fees or penalties and in no event shall any such fees or penalties exceed $10.00 or 1.5 percent of the past due balance, whichever is greater.

Any marketer which willfully violates any provision of this Code section or any duly promulgated rules or regulations issued under this Code section, including but not limited to rules relating to false billing, or which fails, neglects, or refuses to comply with any order of the commission after notice thereof shall be liable for any penalties authorized under Code Section 46-2-91.

As used in this subsection, the phrase “terms and conditions” does not include price. At least 30 days prior to the effective date of any changes in the terms and conditions for service authorized by the marketer’s certificate of authority, a marketer shall file such changes with the commission. Such changes to the terms and conditions of service shall go into effect on the effective date proposed by the marketer; provided, however, that the commission shall be authorized to suspend the effective date of the proposed changes for up to 90 days if it appears to the commission that the proposed terms and conditions are unconscionable or are unfair, deceptive, misleading, or confusing to consumers. If the commission does not issue a final decision on the proposed terms and conditions of service within the 90 day suspension period, the proposed changes shall be deemed approved.

Any consumer determined by the commission to be the victim of slamming shall be able to switch back to his or her desired marketer without any charge. No marketer responsible for slamming a consumer shall be entitled to any remuneration for services provided to that customer, and any refund owed to such a consumer by the marketer who switched the consumer without his or her consent shall be paid within 30 days of the date the commission determined the consumer was a victim of slamming. No marketer responsible for slamming a consumer who is determined to be a victim of slamming shall report to a credit reporting agency any moneys owed by such a consumer to such marketer; any marketer who violates the prohibition set out in this sentence shall be required by the commission to pay such a consumer $1,000.00 for each such prohibited report.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-160

, enacted by Ga. L. 1997, p. 798, § 4; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1084, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1206, § 3; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 16; Ga. L. 2015, p. 1088, § 40/SB 148.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, added the last two sentences in paragraph (a)(3); substituted the present provisions of subsection (c) for the former provisions which read: “A marketer shall not refuse to sell gas to a potential firm retail customer within the territory covered by the marketer’s certificate of authority if the sale can be made by the marketer pursuant to the rules for service authorized by the marketer’s certificate of authority and upon terms that will provide the marketer with just and adequate compensation. The price at which a marketer sells gas shall not be fixed by the commission.”; deleted former subsection (g) which read: “The provisions of Part 2 of Article 15 of Chapter 1 of Title 10, the ‘Fair Business Practices Act of 1975,’ shall apply to a marketer.”; redesignated former subsections (h) through (j) as present subsections (g) through (i), respectively; in subsection (h), deleted “actual” preceding “monthly” in the first sentence, deleted the former second sentence which read: “A 15 day grace period is permitted prior to the application of any penalty.”, and added the last four sentences; inserted “, including but not limited to rules relating to false billing,” in subsection (i); and added subsections (j) and (k).

The 2015 amendment,

effective July 1, 2015, deleted “and the consumers’ utility counsel division of the Governor’s Office of Consumer Affairs” following “The commission” near the beginning of subsection (d).

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

Administrative rules and regulations.

Natural Gas Marketers’ Terms of Service, Official Compilation of Rules and Regulations of State of Georgia Public Service Commission, Gas Utilities, Chapter 515-7-9.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 amendment to O.C.G.A. §

46-4-160

, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 277 (2001).

46-4-160.1.
Dispute resolution between marketer and retail customer; reporting to credit bureaus.

In any case where there is a dispute between a marketer and a retail customer concerning the amount of a gas bill, the marketer shall be required to confer by telephone or some other verifiable means with the retail customer in an attempt to resolve such dispute. In case of any such dispute the marketer shall be prohibited from reporting the name of a retail customer to any consumer reporting agency as defined in Section 603(f) of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act until the marketer has conferred with the retail customer and has complied in all respects with all applicable provisions of this article and the rules and regulations of the commission or has obtained a judgment against the retail customer.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-160.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1084, § 4; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1206, § 4.

Code Commission notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 1084, § 4, effective April 27, 2001, and Ga. L. 2001, p. 1206, § 4, effective April 28, 2001, enacted identical versions of this Code section.

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 enactment of O.C.G.A. §

46-4-160.1

, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 273 (2001).

For note on the 2001 enactment of O.C.G.A. §

46-4-160.1

, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 277 (2001).

46-4-160.2.
Requirements of marketer for billing errors; requiring written request for credit or refund prohibited.

Whenever a marketer discovers or has called to its attention a billing error or other mistake reported to or acknowledged by the marketer, the marketer shall have 30 days to correct the billing error from the date said error is reported to or acknowledged by the marketer. If the marketer does not correct the billing error, the burden of proof shall be on the marketer to show why the bill is correct. During the period the billing error is being disputed, the marketer shall neither impose a late fee or penalty on the disputed amount nor initiate an action to disconnect the customer’s service or collect on the past due balance, if the disputed amount constitutes the total amount of the past due balance. In the event the billing error results in an overpayment by a retail customer of said marketer, such marketer shall be required automatically and immediately to provide:

A credit of the amount of the overpayment to the account of the customer; or

A refund of the amount of the overpayment to the customer.

A marketer shall be prohibited from requiring a retail customer to whom it owes a credit or refund to submit in writing a request for such credit or refund before the marketer complies with the provisions of subsection (a) of this Code section. All credits to the account of the customer or refunds to the customer shall be made within 60 days after the overpayment has been acknowledged or admitted to by the marketer.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-160.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 1084, § 4; Ga. L. 2001, p. 1206, § 4; Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 17.

The 2002 amendment,

effective April 25, 2002, in subsection (a), in the first sentence, inserted “reported to or”, deleted “or admitted to” preceding “by the marketer” and substituted “, the marketer shall have 30 days to correct the billing error from the date said error is reported to or acknowledged by the marketer” for “and resulting”, added the second and third sentences, and added “In the event the billing error results” at the beginning of the fourth sentence.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2001, p. 1084, § 4, effective April 27, 2001, and Ga. L. 2001, p. 1206, § 4, effective April 28, 2001, enacted identical versions of this Code section.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

Law reviews.

For note on the 2001 enactment of O.C.G.A. §

46-4-160.2

, see 18 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 273 (2001).

46-4-160.3.
Voluntary contributions for low-income residential customers.

In order to assist low-income residential consumers, the commission may establish a system by which each marketer’s customers may make voluntary contributions to assist low-income residential consumers. Contributions received by a marketer shall be deposited in the universal service fund to be used to assist low-income residential consumers.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-4-160.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 18.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 25, 2002.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 1, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Natural Gas Consumers’ Relief Act.’ ”

46-4-160.4.
[Reserved] Natural Gas Consumer Education Advisory Board; membership; responsibilities.

History.

Ga. L. 2002, p. 475, § 18; repealed by Ga. L. 2008, p. 1015, § 9, effective May 14, 2008.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2008, p. 1015, § 9 repealed and reserved this Code section, effective May 14, 2008.